Utah statutes.
53-1-202.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Director" means the division director appointed under Section 53-1-203.

(2)  "Division" means the Administrative Services Division created in Section 53-1-203.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

